Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. State Library and Historical Library.

Collateral references. —

81A C.J.S. States, § 261.

Unauthorized photocopying by library as infringement of copyright. 21 ALR Fed. 212.

Sec. 14.56.010.
Department of Education and Early Development to govern library.

The Department of Education and Early Development shall manage and have complete charge of all of the property contained in the institutions known as the state library and state historical library.
The state library and state historical library shall be maintained in the state capital.

History.

(§ 57 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 192 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 14.56.020.
Powers of the Department of Education and Early Development.

The department shall

stimulate and encourage citizens’ participation in the development and improvement of library facilities; and

establish policies, plans, and procedures of the department, and adopt reasonable regulations and orders, with penalties, as may be required.

History.

(§ 57 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For planning and reports, see 4 AAC 57, art. 1.

For library assistance grants, see 4 AAC 57, art. 2.

Sec. 14.56.030.
State library duties.

The department shall undertake state library functions that will benefit the state and its citizens, including

coordinating library services of the state with other educational services and agencies to increase effectiveness and eliminate duplication;

providing reference library service to state and other public officials;

providing library services and administering state and other grants-in-aid to public libraries to supplement and improve their services, the grants to be paid from funds appropriated for that purpose, or from other funds available for that purpose;

providing library service directly to areas in which there is not sufficient population or local revenue to support independent library units;

distributing financial aid to public libraries for extension of library service to surrounding areas and to improve inadequate local library service under regulations adopted by the department;

offering consultant service on library matters to state and municipal libraries, community libraries, school libraries, and libraries in unincorporated communities;

serving as a depository for state and federal publications concerning Alaska;

applying for, receiving, and spending, in accordance with AS 37.07 (the Executive Budget Act), federal, state, or private funds available for library purposes;

recording and distributing the election pamphlet provided for by AS 15.58 to libraries throughout the state for use by blind voters;

establishing and charging fees for reproduction, printing, and handling costs, for mailing and distributing state publications and research data, and for other services authorized by this chapter;

operating and maintaining the Alaska State Archives under AS 40.21.

History.

(§ 57 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1975; am § 25 ch 138 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 70 § 2 (1988); am § 16 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For planning and reports, see 4 AAC 57, art. 1.

For library assistance grants, see 4 AAC 57, art. 2.

Sec. 14.56.035.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 92 ch 36 SLA 1990.]

Secs. 14.56.040 — 14.56.060.
Applications, payments and limitations on grants-in-aid. [Repealed, § 2 ch 36 SLA 1981.]

Sec. 14.56.065.
[Renumbered as AS 14.56.350.]

Sec. 14.56.070.
State museum duties. [Repealed, § 3 ch 192 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 14.56.080.
Historical library duties.

The department shall

collect, catalog, and preserve an Alaska collection consisting of books, laws, pamphlets, periodicals, manuscripts, microreproductions, audiovisual materials, etc.;

serve as a depository for state and federal historical publications concerning Alaska;

acquire, catalog, and maintain private papers and manuscripts relative to Alaska which are adjudged worthy of preservation for reference and research purposes;

perform other functions necessary to the operation of a historical library.

History.

(§ 57 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 191 SLA 1970)